Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-635
Ground water, defined.

Ground water is that water which occurs or moves, seeps, filters, or percolates through the ground under the surface of the land.

Laws 1963, c. 274, § 1, p. 827.

Ground water as defined herein does not include water artificially applied to the land. Peters v. Langrehr, 188 Neb. 480, 197 N.W.2d 698 (1972).